Maryland, session 2025, HB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
25–108.
(a) In this section, “HOV lane” means a high occupancy vehicle lane designated
by the State Highway Administration whose use is restricted by a traffic control device
during specified times to vehicles carrying at least a specified number of occupants.
(b) This section applies only to a plug–in electric drive vehicle that has a
maximum speed capability of at least 65 miles per hour.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1176*

HOUSE BILL 1176
(c) A plug–in electric drive vehicle for which a permit has been applied for and
obtained from the Administration under this section may use an HOV lane at all times
regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle.
(d) (1) The Administration, the State Highway Administration, and the
Department of State Police may consult to design a permit to designate a vehicle as a
plug–in electric drive vehicle authorized to use an HOV lane.
(2) The Administration shall charge a fee, not to exceed $20, for issuing a
permit under this section.
(3) The Administration, on the recommendation of the State Highway
Administration, may limit the number of permits issued to ensure HOV lane operations are
not degraded to an unacceptable level.
(e) On or before January 1 each year, the Administration and the State Highway
Administration jointly shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly on the effect of the use of the plug–in
electric drive vehicle permits issued under this section on the operation of HOV lanes in
the State.
Chapter 121 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. It shall remain effective through September 30, [2025] 2030, and, at the end of
September 30, [2025] 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.